Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-3,139
Motor vehicle insurance data base; immunity.

(1) The state shall not be liable to any person for gathering, managing, or using information in the motor vehicle insurance data base created under section 60-3,136.

(2) No insurance company shall be liable to any person for performing its duties under sections 60-3,136 to 60-3,138, unless and to the extent the insurance company commits a willful and wanton act or omission.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 139.